Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
General Provisions
§ 81-5-63.
Deposit in name of two or more persons; payments to successors of deceased depositors without administration; “successor” defined.

When a deposit has been made or is hereafter made in the name of two (2) or more persons, payable to any one (1) of those persons, or payable to any one (1) of those persons or the survivor, or payable to any one (1) of those persons or to the survivor or survivors, or payable to the persons as joint tenants, the deposit or any part thereof or interest or dividends thereon may be paid to any one (1) of those persons, without liability whether one or more of those persons is living or not, and the receipt of acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the bank for any payment so made. The making of a deposit in that form, or the making of additions thereto, shall create a presumption in any action or proceeding to which either the bank or any survivor is a party of the intention of all the persons named on the deposit to vest title to the deposit and the additions thereto and all interest or dividends thereon in the survivor or survivors.

Any bank may pay to the successor of a deceased depositor, without necessity of administration, any sum to the credit of the decedent not exceeding Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00), without liability to any other persons, relatives or beneficiaries, and the receipt of acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the bank for any payment so made. This section shall apply to all banking institutions, including national banks and postal savings banks within the state. The term “deposit” as used in this section shall include, but not be limited to, any form of deposit or account, such as a savings account, checking account, time deposit, demand deposit or certificate of deposit, whether negotiable, nonnegotiable or otherwise.

For the purposes of this subsection, “successor” means the decedent’s spouse; or, if there is no surviving spouse of the decedent, then the adult with whom any minor children of the decedent are residing; or, if there is no surviving spouse or minor children of the decedent, then any adult child of the decedent; or, if there is no surviving spouse or children of the decedent, then either parent of the decedent; or, if there is no surviving spouse, children or parent of the decedent, then any adult sibling of the decedent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5205; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1950, ch. 201; Laws, 1966, ch. 250; Laws, 1966, ch. 316, § 10-105; Laws, 1968, ch. 251, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 484, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2009.).

§ 81-5-64.
Access to safe-deposit box upon death of sole lessee or last surviving co-lessee; definitions; order of priority; documentation required; rights and responsibilities of persons granted access; liability protections to financial institutions.

Definitions.For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Financial institution” means any banking corporation, national bank, savings and loan association, credit union or postal savings bank operating in this state.

“Safe-deposit box” means a storage container maintained in the vault area of a financial institution leased to a financial institution customer for the safekeeping of personal property that can be accessed with keys, pin numbers or some other security device.

“Successor” means the decedent’s spouse; or if there is no surviving spouse of the decedent, then any adult child of the decedent; or if there is no surviving spouse or adult child of the decedent, then either parent of the decedent; or, if there is no surviving spouse, adult child or parent of the decedent, then any adult sibling of the decedent.

Persons entitled to access in absence of probate or administration.At any time after one hundred eighty (180) days from the death of a sole lessee or the last surviving co-lessee of a safe-deposit box, a financial institution shall grant access in the following order of priority to a safe-deposit box that was leased by the lessee at the time of the lessee’s death:

The personal representative named in the lessee’s will if an estate has not been opened.

A successor of the deceased safe-deposit box lessee, without necessity of administration, if an estate has not been opened.

Documentation required.A person seeking access to the safe-deposit box must provide the financial institution with the following:

Reasonable proof of the lessee’s death;

Reasonable proof of the identity of the person seeking access; and

An affidavit meeting the requirements of subsection (5) of this section.

Inventory.After presenting the financial institution with the items required by subsection (3) of this section, and within a reasonable time that allows the financial institution to comply, a person entitled to access to a safe-deposit box under subsection (2) of this section may exercise the following rights:

The right to open the safe-deposit box in the presence of an employee of the financial institution along with one (1) other person who is either an officer of the financial institution or an attorney with an active bar license, after which an inventory of the contents of the safe-deposit box must be prepared by the person granted access and signed by:

The person granted access to the safe-deposit box;

The employee; and

The third person who witnessed the inventory of the contents.

A copy of the inventory may be retained by the financial institution as a business record.

The right to remove the contents of the safe-deposit box, subject to the requirements and limitations of this section.

The right to cancel the lease for the safe-deposit box after all contents of the safe-deposit box have been removed.

Affidavit.An affidavit required by subsection (3)(c) of this section must contain the following information:

The name of the person leasing the safe-deposit box and the date of the lessee’s death;

The county in which the lessee was domiciled at the time of the lessee’s death;

A statement that no application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative has been granted or is pending in any jurisdiction;

A statement that the value of the entire estate of the decedent, wherever located, excluding all liens and encumbrances thereon, does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); and

A statement under penalty of perjury that the affiant is qualified under subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this section to obtain access to the safe-deposit box leased by the individual and the facts establishing the qualification.

Responsibility of a person granted access.A person to whom access to a safe-deposit box is provided under this section is answerable and accountable to the administrator or executor of the estate of the decedent if one is subsequently opened. However, a financial institution that provides access to a safe-deposit box under this section is discharged and released from liability and responsibility for the contents held in the safe-deposit box to the same extent as if the financial institution had dealt with the personal representative or executor of the decedent. The financial institution is not required to:

Inquire into the truth of any statement in an affidavit presented under this section; or

Participate in the disposition of the assets held in the safe-deposit box or ensure that such assets are properly handled or disposed of.

Prepayment of fees or cost.If a person granted access under this section does not have a key to the safe-deposit box and a financial institution requires the services of a locksmith or other contractor to gain access to a safe-deposit box, the financial institution may charge the person granted access a lost-key, drilling or similar fee, or require the person granted access to pay any cost associated with the services of a locksmith or other contractor necessary to gain access to the safe-deposit box. The financial institution shall have a reasonable amount of time to have the safe-deposit box drilled after payment of the required fee to allow the person granted access to access the safe-deposit box.

Interim access.

A person described in subsection (2) of this section shall be given access to a safe-deposit box before expiration of the required one-hundred-eighty-day period only to remove any will or burial instructions contained therein. The person must first meet all the requirements and conditions of subsection (4)(a) of this section concerning the persons required to be present and a full inventory of the contents of the safe-deposit box; but no other contents of the safe-deposit box may be removed until the one-hundred-eighty-day requirement of subsection (2) has been satisfied. The person given interim access to the safe-deposit box must immediately deliver all wills found and removed from the safe-deposit box to the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the decedent was domiciled at the time of the decedent’s death; failure to do so shall subject the person to criminal liability under Section 97-9-77.

The financial institution may make a complete copy of any document removed and delivered under the terms of this subsection (8) and place that copy, together with a copy of the inventory and supporting documentation noted with the date of delivery, in the safe-deposit box to remain there pending removal of the contents of the box as provided by this section or other law.

Reliance on affidavit

A financial institution that acts in reliance upon an affidavit described in subsection (5) of this section without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting. A financial institution that does not have actual knowledge that the facts contained in the affidavit described in subsection (5) of this section are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the affidavit.

A financial institution shall not be held liable for any costs, expenses, damages or attorney’s fees arising from a grant of access to, or delivery of, the contents held in a safe-deposit box when the access or delivery is under the provisions of this section.

Affidavit form.A document substantially in the following form may be used as the affidavit prescribed in subsection (3)(c) and subsection (5) of this section.

Click to view

SAFE-DEPOSIT BOX AFFIDAVIT The undersigned, after having been first duly sworn, hereby state(s) that: 1. The undersigned makes this affidavit under penalty of perjury pursuant to Section 81-5-64, Mississippi Code of 1972; 2. (“decedent”) died on the day of , 20 , and was domiciled in County; 3. At least one hundred eighty (180) days have elapsed since the death of the decedent; 4. The value of the entire estate of the decedent, wherever located, excluding all liens and encumbrances thereon, does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); 5. No application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative of the estate has been granted or is pending in any jurisdiction; 6. At his/her death, decedent was the last surviving lessee/sole lessee of safe-deposit box number located at . 7. The undersigned is qualified to obtain access to the safe-deposit box leased by the decedent as the successor as defined in Section 81-5-64, Mississippi Code of 1972: (Choose one) a. The decedent’s spouse; b. Or if there is no surviving spouse of the decedent, then any adult child of the decedent; c. Or if there is no surviving spouse or adult child of the decedent, then either parent of the decedent; or d. If there is no surviving spouse, adult child or parent of the decedent, then any adult sibling of the decedent. The undersigned hereby ask(s) the financial institution to allow access to the safe-deposit box of the decedent to allow for the cancellation of the rental contract and relinquishment of the contents contained therein. SIGNATURE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT Date: Printed Name: Address: Telephone Number: This document was acknowledged before me on (Date) by (Name of Affiant). Signature of Notary (Seal, if any.) My commission expires:

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 81-5-65.
Accounts of deceased depositors to be reported; publicity of same.

It shall be the duty of every officer and employee of the department of bank supervision to report to the state comptroller the name of every person not known to be living who appears by the records of the bank to have a sum of money on deposit; provided this section shall only apply to deposits made five years or more prior to such report which have not been added to by further deposits or reduced by withdrawal. The state comptroller shall give publicity to any such fact in such manner as he may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5206; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-67.
Settlement of adverse claims to deposits.

Notice to any bank doing business in this state of an adverse claim to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of any person shall not be effectual to cause the bank to recognize such adverse claimant unless such adverse claimant shall also either procure a restraining order, injunction or other appropriate process against the bank from a court of competent jurisdiction in a cause therein instituted by him wherein the person to whose credit the deposit stands is made a party and served with summons, or shall execute to the bank, in form, and with sureties, acceptable to it a bond, indemnifying it from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses for and on account of the payment of such adverse claim or the dishonor of the check or other order of the person to whose credit the deposit stands on the books of the bank.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5207; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-69.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 320, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Codes, 1942, § 5208; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; 1936, ch. 165; 1942, ch. 262; 1976, ch. 368]

§ 81-5-71.
Certifying checks.

No officer, clerk or employee of any bank shall certify to a check unless the amount thereof actually stands to the credit of the drawer on the books of the bank, and any person who shall wilfully violate this provision shall on conviction thereof, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars. The amount of any check certified shall be at once charged to the drawer’s account and credited to certified check account, there to remain until said check is retired. Any such check so certified by a duly authorized person shall be a good and valid obligation of the bank in the hands of the holder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5219; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1997).

[Codes, 1942, § 5209; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; 1936, ch. 165; 1962, ch. 175; 1968, ch. 255, § 1]

§ 81-5-75.
Authorization for payment of dividend.

No state bank shall declare or pay any dividend upon its common stock unless such bank has received written approval by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance. Directors declaring a dividend in violation of the provisions of this section shall be personally liable to the full amount of the dividend so declared and it shall be the duty of the commissioner, upon discovering the payment of any such dividend, to forthwith make demand upon the directors that the same be restored to the bank, and upon their failure so to do he shall cause suit to be brought against them in the chancery court of the county in which the bank is located, either in his name or in the name of the bank, to recover the same for the benefit of the bank.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5210; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1994, ch. 320, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 81-5-77.
Limit of loans and extensions of credit to single borrower.

The liability to a bank by a person, company, corporation or firm for all loans and extensions of credit, including in the liability of such person, company or firm, where a partnership, the liabilities of the several members thereof, shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the aggregate unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the bank.

The following shall not be restricted to or considered as coming within the limitations of twenty percent (20%) prescribed in subsection (a):

Loans and discounts secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actually existing values, provided the amount of such loans and discounts shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actually existing values.

Loans and discounts secured by bonds, certificates or notes constituting direct obligations of the United States government, or bonds fully guaranteed by the United States government, or by full faith and credit obligations of the State of Mississippi; however, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance shall from time to time determine and fix the maximum percentage of the par value of all such securities that may be loaned.

Loans and discounts to the extent that they are secured or covered by guaranties, or by commitments, or agreements to take over or purchase the same, made by any federal reserve bank, or by the United States, or any department, bureau, board, commission or establishment of the United States, including any corporation wholly owned directly or indirectly by the United States; provided that such guaranties, agreements or commitments are unconditional and are to be performed by payment within sixty (60) days after demand; provided, further, that the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance is authorized to define the terms used in this section and may by regulation control the making of loans under this paragraph (iii).

Loans and discounts secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending bank to the credit of the borrower.

The limit on loans and extensions of credit applicable to any one (1) person, company, corporation, or firm under this section shall take into consideration credit exposure arising from derivative transactions between the bank and the party. For purposes of this section, the term “derivative transaction” includes any transaction that is a contract, agreement, swap, warrant, note, or option that is based, in whole or in part, on the value of, any interest in, or any quantitative measure or the occurrence of any event relating to, one or more commodities, securities, currencies, interest or other rates, indices, or other assets.

Any officer or director who approves or makes loans prohibited in this section shall be liable individually for the full amount of the principal and interest of any such loan or extension of credit. If the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance discovers, in any examination of any open bank that there is a loss on any loan or extension of credit made in violation of this section, he shall make demand of all directors and officers approving or making such loan or extension of credit for payment of the entire unpaid balance on any such loan or extension of credit. Like demand shall be made and suit brought by the receiver of any bank in liquidation.

However, this section shall not apply to loans or extensions of credit to the State of Mississippi, or to any political subdivision thereof, nor to any levee district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5211; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1944, ch. 253, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 361; Laws, 1980, ch. 328; Laws, 1995, ch. 308, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 19, 2013.).

§ 81-5-79.
Small loans.

Any bank or trust company heretofore or hereafter organized under any general or special law of this state and doing a banking business in this state and any national bank doing business in this state shall have power, in addition to such other powers as it may have, to make loans to any borrower or debtor in an amount not exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to be repaid in monthly installments and may charge interest thereon at not exceeding twelve percent (12%) per annum for the entire period of the loan, and aggregate the principal and interest for the entire period of the loan and divide same into monthly installments, and may take security therefor as for other loans.

A charge of Ten Dollars (10) in lieu of interest may be made on any loan payable in a single payment, and a charge of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) in lieu of interest may be made on any loan payable in monthly installments.

No further interest or discount or service charge, or other charge by way of compensation for the use of such money, shall be made directly or indirectly on any such loan or discount by any such bank, trust company or national bank, made under the provisions of this section, in addition to the charges herein expressly provided for.

However, this section shall in no way repeal any of the other present usury statutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5212; Laws, 1940, ch. 204; Laws, 1958, ch. 167; Laws, 1980, ch. 492, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 468, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 501, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 510, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 81-5-81.
Effect of third-party deposits to induce making of unsound loans.

The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Reserve Bank, or the State Comptroller, Department of Bank Supervision, State of Mississippi, is hereby authorized to freeze any deposit which is made by any third party for the purpose of enticing any bank in the State of Mississippi, whether state or national, into making a loan which is unsafe and unsound and which does not mature prior to any attempt to withdraw such deposit so used to entice the making of said loan. This statute relates to deposits and loans which are not related in the customary function of business but are manipulated and procured by third parties (by whatever name known) for profit and the withdrawal or attempt to withdraw said deposit before said loan is sufficiently satisfied shall be sufficient authority for any state or federal supervising authority to act promptly on evidence presented to it or obtained by said agency. If any bank in the State of Mississippi shall be put into liquidation and such deposit and loan arrangements have made any contribution whatsoever to the insolvency of said bank, then the state or federal agency, the duly appointed liquidating agency or receiver, or the appropriate chancery court in charge of the liquidation of said bank shall have the right and duty to withhold any liquidating dividends or payments for said deposit or deposits until the loan or loans which the deposits have influenced are fully satisfied, and the liquidating agent or receiver shall have the right upon the approval of the chancery court to assign said loan or loans so influenced to the depositor or depositors in satisfaction of said deposit or deposits claimed against the assets of the bank in liquidation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5287.9; Laws, 1971, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1971).

§ 81-5-83.
Limit of borrowing power of banks.

No bank chartered and doing business under the laws of this state shall issue bills payable or be liable on rediscounts at any time to a total amount in excess of three times its capital and surplus. However, this limit may be exceeded by a bank with the consent and approval in writing, of the state comptroller. Any violation of this provision by a bank shall authorize the state comptroller to deal with it as a bank being operated in violation of the laws, provided, however, that this section shall in no wise impair any obligation of banks for payment of loans and rediscounts in excess of the limit herein provided, nor shall any bank owing money heretofore borrowed in excess of this limit be held to be acting in violation of the law as to such existing loans.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5213; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-85.
Consolidation, conversion or merger of state or state and national banks, state or federal savings and loan associations and state-chartered banks, and state or federal savings banks and state-chartered banks.

Any two (2) or more state-chartered banks, or any national bank and any state-chartered bank, or any state or federal savings and loan association and any state-chartered bank, or any state or federal savings bank and any state-chartered bank, may, with the approval of the commissioner, consolidate with or merge into one (1) state-chartered bank, under the charter of the existing state bank, on such terms and conditions, as may be lawfully agreed upon, adopted and approved in a merger plan in accordance with Article 11, Chapter 4 of Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972. Following receipt of the required corporate approvals and approval of the merger plan by the commissioner, the resulting amendments to charters of any state-chartered bank that is a party to the merger plan shall be approved and filed with other state officials in accordance with Section 81-3-15. The capital stock of such consolidated bank shall not be less than that required under the Mississippi banking laws for the organization of a bank in the place in which it is located. And all the rights, franchises and interests of the institutions so consolidated in and to every species of property, personal and mixed, and choses in action thereto belonging, shall be deemed to be transferred to and vested in such bank into which they are consolidated without any deed or other transfer, and the said consolidated bank shall hold and enjoy the same and all rights of property, franchises and interests in the same manner and to the same extent as were held and enjoyed by the institutions so consolidated therewith.

Any national bank, state or federal savings and loan association, or state or federal savings bank may apply for conversion into a state-chartered bank upon the affirmative vote of the shareholders owning at least two-thirds (2/3) of its capital stock outstanding, or of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of the members, at a meeting called by the directors, notice of which, specifying the purpose, shall be given the manner required by the bylaws, or in the absence of such bylaw, then by sending the notice to each shareholder of record by registered mail at least ten (10) days before the meeting. Upon such affirmative vote, the converting institution may apply for a certificate of authority by filing with the commissioner a certificate signed by its president and cashier which sets forth the corporate action herein prescribed and asserts that the institution has complied with the provisions of the laws of the United States. The converting institution shall also file with the commissioner the plan of conversion and the proposed amendments to its articles of incorporation as approved by the stockholders for the operation of the institution as a state bank. Upon receipt of the prescribed application, the commissioner shall examine all facts associated with the conversion. The expenses and cost incurred for such special examination shall be paid by the institution applying for permission to convert. The commissioner shall present his findings and recommendations to the State Board of Banking Review for consideration. Upon approval by the State Board of Banking Review, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the applicant allowing the conversion to proceed.

Any bank, savings and loan association or savings bank chartered by the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized to convert into, consolidate with, or merge with a national bank domiciled in the State of Mississippi, with the national bank charter surviving, without approval of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, or any state authority whatsoever.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5214; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1978, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 308, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1997); Laws, 2018, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 81-5-87.
Holding of real estate by bank.

Any banking corporation doing business in this state may purchase, hold and convey real estate for the following purposes and no others:

Such real estate as shall be necessary in which to transact the business of any such bank, including with its banking offices, premises in the same building to rent as a source of income, also such real estate and improvements necessary for the operation and conduct of its branch banks, branch offices, drive-in windows and parking facilities not connected to the main office, branch banks or branch offices. The book value of the bank’s real estate shall not exceed fifty percentum (50%) of its net capital funds as published by the last preceding call statement as of December 31, and this shall be without regard to population but subject to the approval of the state comptroller; however, the book value of such real estate and improvements shall be reduced each year the amount that is allowable for depreciation by the Internal Revenue Service until such book value shall be reduced to at least twenty-five percentum (25%) of the net capital funds as shown by its last published statement as of December 31. None of the facilities, main banking quarters, branch banks, branch offices, drive-in windows or parking facilities not connected to the main office, branch banks or branch offices shall be purchased or commenced without first having the approval of the state comptroller.

Such real estate as shall be purchased by or conveyed to such bank in satisfaction of or on account of debts previously contracted in the usual course of its business.

Such real estate as shall be purchased at sale under judgments, decrees or mortgages, or deeds of trust, foreclosure under securities held by such bank or under any security or lien which is a superior lien to that held by said bank.

Upon approval of the state comptroller, a bank may purchase additional real estate for future expansion or future new quarters but if said real estate is not developed for the purpose intended and purchased, the said real estate shall be disposed of within a period of five (5) years or reduced to a book value of one dollar ($1.00).

Any real estate acquired as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be carried in the bank statement at such sound values as may be approved by the state comptroller, not to exceed its cost to the bank, and shall be sold within five years after the title thereto is acquired; unless the consent of the state comptroller is obtained in writing, extending such period; provided, however, no such extension shall be for more than five years. If any such real estate is not sold within the time herein limited, or within the time as extended by the state comptroller, it shall not thereafter be carried as a book asset of the bank in excess of one dollar ($1.00). It is not the purpose of other real estate acquired under subsections (b) and (c) of this section to be treated as part of the fifty percentum (50%) of net capital recited in the first paragraph of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5216; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1952, ch. 182; Laws, 1970, ch. 271, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 81-5-89.
Limitations upon acceptances.

A state bank may accept drafts or bills of exchange drawn upon it having not more than six (6) months’ sight to run, exclusive of days of grace, which grew out of transactions involving the shipment of goods, provided shipping documents conveying or securing title are attached as security at the time of acceptance of such drafts and bills of exchange or which are secured at the time of acceptance by warehouse receipts or other such documents conveying or securing title covering readily marketable staples not subject to rapid deterioration.

No bank shall accept bills for any one person, company, firm or corporation to an amount equal at any time in the aggregate to more than ten per centum of its paid-up and unimpaired capital stock and surplus; and no such bank shall accept such bills to an amount equal at any time in the aggregate to more than one-half of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and surplus.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5217; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-91.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1998, ch. 392, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1998).

[Codes, 1942, § 5220; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; 1968, ch. 253, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970]

§ 81-5-93.
Clearinghouse associations authorized.

Banks or banking institutions in any municipality or county or counties in this state may organize and establish clearinghouse associations, composed of such banks and banking institutions as may become members thereof, by voluntary action for the purpose of effecting daily settlements and exchanges by and between the associate banks, the payment or settlements at such clearinghouse of daily balances between such members resulting from exchanges, payment of checks and other orders of money and for the purpose of making provision for the proper conduct and management of the banking operations of such municipality or county or counties, and of the members of such association. Such clearinghouse associations may or may not be incorporated. If incorporated, a clearinghouse association shall be organized as a corporation without capital stock and not organized for profit or gain and the stock thereof may be held by the member banks, each such member bank being entitled to hold not more than one (1) share therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5221; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1982, ch. 341, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 81-5-95.
Powers of clearinghouse associations.

Clearinghouse associations, by the action of the members thereof, shall have the power to adopt and enact rules, regulations and bylaws providing: (a) for officers and business agents of such clearinghouse association, and for the maintenance of same; (b) for the conduct of the affairs and business of the association; (c) for the settlement of differences or controversies between members thereof relating to banking transactions; (d) for aid from such clearinghouse association or the members thereof to any bank or member which may become involved or embarrassed; (e) to collect dues and payments as fixed by the bylaws or regulations from members thereof, for any of the purposes of such association; (f) to advance moneys or loans to any member, on deposit of collateral or other securities; (g) to provide uniform charges for collections or orders, for uniform rates of exchange and discounts provided or required by the general laws of the State of Mississippi, and for service charged upon unprofitable accounts, and for handling checks drawn against insufficient funds; (h) and generally to have all other powers usual and customary for clearinghouse associations, to encourage a faithful and honest administration of banking trusts and public duties, to aid in the preservation of public credit and of confidence in the financial system and conditions of the State of Mississippi, and the business communities thereof. All rates, rules, regulations and bylaws promulgated must, before becoming effective, receive the approval of the state comptroller. Discretionary power is vested in the state comptroller to supervise all rates, rules, regulations and bylaws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5222; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-97.
Banking hours.

The commissioner of banking and consumer finance may, from time to time, adopt and promulgate rules regulating banking hours, and such rules shall have all the force and effect of law. In addition thereto, the commissioner may permit a bank to close its doors for business at such time or times during the week as the commissioner determines will not prevent the rendering of proper and reasonable banking service to the community and trade area in which the bank is located. The commissioner shall not authorize any bank to close for more than one whole day during any week, state and federal legal holidays and Sundays excepted; provided, however, that in the event any state or federal legal holiday shall fall on a Saturday, then the commissioner may permit banks to observe the preceding Friday as a legal holiday, or if such holiday shall fall on Sunday, then the commissioner may permit banks to observe the next following Monday as a legal holiday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5223; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1954, ch. 165; Laws, 1962, ch. 176; Laws, 1976, ch. 369; Laws, 1982, ch. 314, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 81-5-98.
Drive-in teller windows and branch offices considered to be branch banks.

Drive-in teller windows and branch offices in operation on July 1, 1986, shall on such date, and thereafter, be considered branch banks for the purpose of applying the branching provisions of this chapter and are authorized to continue operating as branch banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 469, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 81-5-99.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 469, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

[Codes, 1942, § 5224.3; Laws, 1964, ch. 224, § 1; 1972, ch. 318, § 1]